Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
Article 6 Bulk Transfers

Article require‘s transferee to help in creditor protection. —

The effect of this article is to require transferee to help in creditor protection, principally a matter of giving notice, if transferee wants to ensure that they cannot reach goods in transferee’s hands after transferee has paid for them. McClain v. Laurens Glass Co., 127 Ga. App. 316, 193 S.E.2d 194 (1972).

Article applies to secured as well as to unsecured creditors.

NCR Co. v. Stubbs, 29 Ga. App. 543, 116 S.E. 44 (1923) (decided under former Civil Code 1910, § 3226).

11-6-101 through 11-6-111.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3D-1/SB 65, effective July 1, 2015.